Illinois, session 104th, SB1602.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Sexual Assault Survivors Emergency 5Treatment Act is amended by changing Sections 1a, 2, 2.05, 62.2, 3, 5, 5.1, 5.2, 5.3, 5.4, 5.5, 6.2, 6.5, 6.6, 7, 7.5, 8, 7and 10 and by adding Section 15 as follows: 8    (410 ILCS 70/1a)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 87-1a)9    Sec. 1a. Definitions. 10    (a) In this Act: 11    "Acute sexual assault" means a sexual assault that has 12recently occurred. For patients under the age of 13, "acute 13sexual assault" means a sexual assault that has occurred 14within the past 72 hours. For patients 13 years old or older, 15"acute sexual assault" means a sexual assault that has 16occurred within the past 168 hours. 17    "Advanced practice registered nurse" has the meaning 18provided in Section 50-10 of the Nurse Practice Act. 19    "Ambulance provider" means an individual or entity that 20owns and operates a business or service using ambulances or 21emergency medical services vehicles to transport emergency 22patients. 23    "Approved pediatric health care facility" means a health   SB1602 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1care facility, other than a hospital, with a sexual assault 2treatment plan approved by the Department to provide medical 3forensic examinations services to sexual assault survivors 4under the age of 18 who present with a complaint of acute 5sexual assault within a minimum of the last 7 days or who have 6disclosed past sexual assault by a specific individual and 7were in the care of that individual within a minimum of the 8last 7 days. 9    "Areawide sexual assault treatment plan" means a plan, 10developed by hospitals or by hospitals and approved pediatric 11health care facilities in a community or area to be served, 12which provides for medical forensic examinations services to 13acute sexual assault survivors that shall be made available by 14each of the participating hospitals and approved pediatric 15health care facilities. 16    "Assent" means the expressed willingness to participate in 17an activity or give permission. 18    "Board-certified child abuse pediatrician" means a 19physician certified by the American Board of Pediatrics in 20child abuse pediatrics.21    "Board-eligible child abuse pediatrician" means a 22physician who has completed the requirements set forth by the 23American Board of Pediatrics to take the examination for 24certification in child abuse pediatrics. 25    "Department" means the Department of Public Health. 26    "Emergency contraception" means medication as approved by   SB1602 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1the federal Food and Drug Administration (FDA) that can 2significantly reduce the risk of pregnancy if taken within 72 3hours after sexual assault. 4    "Follow-up healthcare" means healthcare services related 5to a sexual assault, including laboratory services and 6pharmacy services, rendered within 180 days of the initial 7visit as a result of the sexual assault for medical forensic 8services. 9    "Health care professional" means a physician, a physician 10assistant, a sexual assault forensic examiner, an advanced 11practice registered nurse, a registered professional nurse, a 12licensed practical nurse, or a sexual assault nurse examiner. 13    "Hospital" means a hospital licensed under the Hospital 14Licensing Act or operated under the University of Illinois 15Hospital Act, any outpatient center included in the hospital's 16sexual assault treatment plan where hospital employees provide 17medical forensic examinations services, and an out-of-state 18hospital that has consented to the jurisdiction of the 19Department under Section 2.06. 20    "Illinois State Police Sexual Assault Evidence Collection 21Kit" means a prepackaged set of materials and forms to be used 22for the collection of evidence relating to sexual assault. The 23standardized evidence collection kit for the State of Illinois 24shall be the Illinois State Police Sexual Assault Evidence 25Collection Kit. 26    "Law enforcement agency having jurisdiction" means the law   SB1602 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1enforcement agency in the jurisdiction where an alleged sexual 2assault or sexual abuse occurred.3    "Licensed practical nurse" has the meaning provided in 4Section 50-10 of the Nurse Practice Act. 5    "Medical forensic examination services" means health care 6delivered to patients in within or under the care and 7supervision of a qualified medical provider personnel working 8at in a designated emergency department of a treatment 9hospital, treatment hospital with approved pediatric transfer, 10or an approved pediatric health care facility. "Medical 11forensic examination services" includes, but is not limited 12to, taking a medical history, performing photo documentation, 13performing a physical and anogenital examination, assessing 14the patient for evidence collection, collecting evidence in 15accordance with a statewide sexual assault evidence collection 16program administered by the Illinois State Police using the 17Illinois State Police Sexual Assault Evidence Collection Kit, 18if appropriate, assessing the patient for drug-facilitated or 19alcohol-facilitated sexual assault, providing an evaluation of 20and care for sexually transmitted infection and human 21immunodeficiency virus (HIV), pregnancy risk evaluation and 22care, and discharge and follow-up healthcare planning. 23    "Pediatric health care facility" means a clinic or 24physician's office that provides medical services to patients 25under the age of 18.26    "Pediatric sexual assault survivor" means a person under   SB1602 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1the age of 13 who presents for a medical forensic examination 2services in relation to injuries or trauma resulting from a 3sexual assault.4    "Photo documentation" means digital photographs or 5colposcope videos stored and backed up securely in the 6original file format. 7    "Physician" means a person licensed to practice medicine 8in all its branches. 9    "Physician assistant" has the meaning provided in Section 104 of the Physician Assistant Practice Act of 1987.11    "Prepubescent sexual assault survivor" means a female who 12is under the age of 18 years and has not had a first menstrual 13cycle or a male who is under the age of 18 years and has not 14started to develop secondary sex characteristics who presents 15for medical forensic services in relation to injuries or 16trauma resulting from a sexual assault.17    "Qualified medical provider" means a board-certified child 18abuse pediatrician, board-eligible child abuse pediatrician, a 19sexual assault forensic examiner, or a sexual assault nurse 20examiner who has access to photo documentation tools, and who 21participates in peer review. 22    "Registered Professional Nurse" has the meaning provided 23in Section 50-10 of the Nurse Practice Act. 24    "Sexual assault" means:25        (1) an act of sexual conduct; as used in this 26    paragraph, "sexual conduct" has the meaning provided under   SB1602 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1    Section 11-0.1 of the Criminal Code of 2012; or2        (2) any act of sexual penetration; as used in this 3    paragraph, "sexual penetration" has the meaning provided 4    under Section 11-0.1 of the Criminal Code of 2012 and 5    includes, without limitation, acts prohibited under 6    Sections 11-1.20 through 11-1.60 of the Criminal Code of 7    2012. 8    "Sexual assault forensic examiner" means a physician or 9physician assistant who has completed training that meets or 10is substantially similar to the Sexual Assault Nurse Examiner 11Education Guidelines established by the International 12Association of Forensic Nurses.13    "Sexual assault nurse examiner" means an advanced practice 14registered nurse or registered professional nurse who is 15designated as Adult/Adolescent, Pediatric/Adolescent, or both, 16according to the population of survivors the nurse is 17qualified to treat and:18        (1) is certified as a Sexual Assault Nurse Examiner by 19    the International Association of Forensic Nurses; or20        (2) has completed a sexual assault nurse examiner 21    training program that meets the Sexual Assault Nurse 22    Examiner Education Guidelines established by the 23    International Association of Forensic Nurses and is 24    approved by the Sexual Assault Nurse Examiner Program 25    Coordinator.26    "Sexual Assault Nurse Examiner Program Coordinator" means   SB1602 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1an advanced practice registered nurse or a registered 2professional nurse that is a qualified medical provider, and 3who is the employee at Attorney General's Office who oversees 4the Sexual Assault Nurse Examiner Program.5    "Sexual assault services voucher" means a document 6generated by a hospital or approved pediatric health care 7facility where at the time the sexual assault survivor first 8presents and receives outpatient medical forensic services 9that may be used to seek payment for any ambulance services, a 10medical forensic examination, medical care and treatment as 11defined by 77 Ill. Adm. Code Part 545 services, laboratory 12services, pharmacy services, and follow-up healthcare provided 13as a result of the sexual assault. 14    "Sexual assault survivor" means a person who presents for 15a medical forensic examination or medical care and treatment 16services in relation to injuries or trauma resulting from a 17sexual assault. 18    "Sexual assault transfer plan" means a written plan 19developed by a hospital and approved by the Department, which 20describes the hospital's procedures for transferring acute 21sexual assault survivors to another hospital, and an approved 22pediatric health care facility, if applicable, in order to 23receive medical forensic examinations performed by qualified 24medical providers services.25    "Sexual assault treatment plan" means a written plan that 26describes the procedures and protocols for providing medical   SB1602 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1forensic examinations services to acute sexual assault 2survivors who present themselves for such services performed 3by qualified medical providers, either directly or through 4transfer from a hospital or an approved pediatric health care 5facility. 6    "Transfer hospital" means a hospital with a sexual assault 7transfer plan approved by the Department. 8    "Transfer services" means the appropriate medical 9screening examination and necessary stabilizing treatment 10prior to the transfer of a sexual assault survivor to another a 11hospital or an approved pediatric health care facility that 12provides medical forensic services to sexual assault survivors 13pursuant to a sexual assault treatment plan or areawide sexual 14assault treatment plan.15    "Treatment hospital" means a hospital with a sexual 16assault treatment plan approved by the Department to provide 17medical forensic examinations services to acute all sexual 18assault survivors who present with a complaint of sexual 19assault within a minimum of the last 7 days or who have 20disclosed past sexual assault by a specific individual and 21were in the care of that individual within a minimum of the 22last 7 days.23    "Treatment hospital with approved pediatric transfer" 24means a hospital with a treatment plan approved by the 25Department to provide medical forensic examinations services 26to sexual assault survivors 13 years old or older who present   SB1602 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1with a complaint of acute sexual assault within a minimum of 2the last 7 days or who have disclosed past sexual assault by a 3specific individual and were in the care of that individual 4within a minimum of the last 7 days. 5    (b) This Section is effective on and after January 1, 62024. 7(Source: P.A. 102-22, eff. 6-25-21; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 8102-674, eff. 11-30-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-1097, eff. 91-1-23; 102-1106, eff. 1-1-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23.) 10    (410 ILCS 70/2)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 87-2)11    Sec. 2. Hospital and approved pediatric health care 12facility requirements for sexual assault plans. 13    (a) Every hospital required to be licensed by the 14Department pursuant to the Hospital Licensing Act, or operated 15under the University of Illinois Hospital Act that provides 16general medical and surgical hospital services shall provide 17either (i) transfer services to all acute sexual assault 18survivors, (ii) medical forensic examinations services to all 19acute sexual assault survivors, or (iii) transfer services to 20pediatric acute sexual assault survivors and medical forensic 21examinations services to acute sexual assault survivors 13 22years old or older, in accordance with rules adopted by the 23Department.24    In addition, every such hospital, regardless of whether or 25not a request is made for reimbursement, shall submit to the   SB1602 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1Department a plan to provide either (i) transfer services to 2all acute sexual assault survivors, (ii) medical forensic 3examinations services to all acute sexual assault survivors, 4or (iii) transfer services to pediatric acute sexual assault 5survivors and medical forensic examinations services to acute 6sexual assault survivors 13 years old or older within the time 7frame established by the Department. The Department shall 8approve such plan for either (i) transfer services to all 9acute sexual assault survivors, (ii) medical forensic 10examinations services to all acute sexual assault survivors, 11or (iii) transfer services to pediatric acute sexual assault 12survivors and medical forensic examinations services to acute 13sexual assault survivors 13 years old or older, if it finds 14that the implementation of the proposed plan would provide (i) 15transfer services or (ii) medical forensic examinations 16services for acute sexual assault survivors in accordance with 17the requirements of this Act and provide sufficient 18protections from the risk of pregnancy to acute sexual assault 19survivors. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this 20paragraph, the Department may approve a sexual assault 21transfer plan for the provision of medical forensic 22examinations services if: 23        (1) a treatment hospital with approved pediatric 24    transfer has agreed, as part of an areawide treatment 25    plan, to accept acute sexual assault survivors 13 years of 26    age or older from the proposed transfer hospital, if the   SB1602 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1    treatment hospital with approved pediatric transfer is 2    geographically closer to the transfer hospital than a 3    treatment hospital or another treatment hospital with 4    approved pediatric transfer and such transfer is not 5    unduly burdensome on the sexual assault survivor; and6        (2) a treatment hospital has agreed, as a part of an 7    areawide treatment plan, to accept acute sexual assault 8    survivors under 13 years of age from the proposed transfer 9    hospital and transfer to the treatment hospital would not 10    unduly burden the sexual assault survivor.11    The Department may not approve a sexual assault transfer 12plan unless a treatment hospital has agreed, as a part of an 13areawide treatment plan, to accept acute sexual assault 14survivors from the proposed transfer hospital and a transfer 15to the treatment hospital would not unduly burden the sexual 16assault survivor.17    In determining whether to approve a sexual assault 18transfer plan under this subsection, the Department shall 19evaluate whether the proposed plan would result in unduly 20burdensome patient transfers. To avoid unduly burdensome 21patient transfers, the Department shall consider the following 22factors in approving or denying the proposed sexual assault 23transfer plan:24        (1) geographic proximity to the treatment hospital or 25    treatment hospital with approved pediatric transfer, with 26    priority given to sexual assault transfer plans which   SB1602 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1    transfer acute sexual assault survivors to the 2    geographically closest treatment hospital or treatment 3    hospital with approved pediatric transfer that has the 4    capacity to provide ease of transfer to and accept acute 5    sexual assault survivors from the proposed transfer 6    hospital and is willing to provide them medical forensic 7    examinations;8        (2) the existence of an areawide treatment plan to 9    provide medical forensic examinations to acute sexual 10    assault survivors in the region;11        (3) the average daily, monthly, and annual number of 12    sexual assault survivors who presented and received 13    medical forensic examinations;14        (4) the number of qualified medical providers employed 15    at the hospital;16        (5) the existence of other agreements between transfer 17    hospitals and other acute care hospitals related to 18    patient referral and transfer, communication, patient 19    medical records, and emergency and non-emergency patient 20    transportation;21        (6) the number of transfer hospitals with which a 22    treatment hospital has a transfer agreement and its 23    capacity to enter into additional transfer agreements, for 24    which special consideration shall be given to treatment 25    hospitals currently providing medical forensic 26    examinations to acute sexual assault survivors; and  SB1602 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1        (7) the provisions in the plan for initial 2    transportation to the treatment hospital or treatment 3    hospital with approved pediatric transfer, as well as 4    appropriate return transportation, which should include 5    hospital-facilitated and survivor-facilitated options to 6    attempt to minimize survivor wait times while also taking 7    into consideration extenuating factors outside the 8    hospital's control, including which facility is 9    responsible for arranging transportation, transportation 10    options, and hospital-specific factors influencing 11    survivor wait time, including, but not limited to, 12    discharge planning and arranging hospital-facilitated 13    transportation in a manner that minimizes the amount of 14    time a survivor waits for transportation under the 15    proposed plan.16    In approving or denying the proposed sexual assault 17transfer plan, the Department may also consider other factors, 18including, but not limited to, hospital capacity, emergency 19department patient volume, communication, and transportation 20capacity. 21    Hospitals located in counties with a population of less 22than 1,000,000 and within a 20-mile radius of a 4-year public 23university shall submit an areawide sexual assault treatment 24plan that is approved by the Department. The approved areawide 25plan shall include at least one treatment hospital or 26treatment hospital with approved pediatric transfer within the   SB1602 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b120-mile radius of the 4-year public university. 2    In counties with a population of less than 1,000,000, the 3Department may not approve a sexual assault transfer plan for 4a hospital located within a 20-mile radius of a 4-year public 5university, not including community colleges, unless there is 6a treatment hospital with a sexual assault treatment plan 7approved by the Department within a 20-mile radius of the 84-year public university.9    A transfer must be in accordance with federal and State 10laws and local ordinances. 11    A treatment hospital with approved pediatric transfer must 12submit an areawide treatment plan under Section 3 of this Act 13that includes a written agreement with a treatment hospital 14stating that the treatment hospital will provide medical 15forensic examinations services to pediatric sexual assault 16survivors transferred from the treatment hospital with 17approved pediatric transfer. The areawide treatment plan may 18also include an approved pediatric health care facility.19    A transfer hospital must submit an areawide treatment plan 20under Section 3 of this Act that includes a written agreement 21with a treatment hospital stating that the treatment hospital 22will provide medical forensic examinations services to all 23sexual assault survivors transferred from the transfer 24hospital. The areawide treatment plan may also include an 25approved pediatric health care facility. Notwithstanding 26anything to the contrary in this paragraph, the areawide   SB1602 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1treatment plan may include a written agreement with a 2treatment hospital with approved pediatric transfer that is 3geographically closer than other hospitals providing medical 4forensic examinations services to sexual assault survivors 13 5years of age or older stating that the treatment hospital with 6approved pediatric transfer will provide medical forensic 7examinations services to sexual assault survivors 13 years of 8age or older who are transferred from the transfer hospital. 9If the areawide treatment plan includes a written agreement 10with a treatment hospital with approved pediatric transfer, it 11must also include a written agreement with a treatment 12hospital stating that the treatment hospital will provide 13medical forensic examinations services to sexual assault 14survivors under 13 years of age who are transferred from the 15transfer hospital. 16    Beginning January 1, 2019, each treatment hospital and 17treatment hospital with approved pediatric transfer shall 18ensure that emergency department attending physicians, 19physician assistants, advanced practice registered nurses, and 20registered professional nurses providing clinical services, 21who do not meet the definition of a qualified medical provider 22in Section 1a of this Act, receive a minimum of 2 hours of 23sexual assault training by July 1, 2020 or until the treatment 24hospital or treatment hospital with approved pediatric 25transfer certifies to the Department, in a form and manner 26prescribed by the Department, that it employs or contracts   SB1602 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1with a qualified medical provider in accordance with 2subsection (a-7) of Section 5, whichever occurs first.3    After July 1, 2020 or once a treatment hospital or a 4treatment hospital with approved pediatric transfer certifies 5compliance with subsection (a-7) of Section 5, whichever 6occurs first, each treatment hospital and treatment hospital 7with approved pediatric transfer shall ensure that emergency 8department attending physicians, physician assistants, 9advanced practice registered nurses, and registered 10professional nurses providing clinical services, who do not 11meet the definition of a qualified medical provider in Section 121a of this Act, receive a minimum of 2 hours of continuing 13education on responding to acute sexual assault survivors 14every 2 years. Protocols for training shall be included in the 15hospital's sexual assault treatment plan. 16    Sexual assault training provided under this subsection may 17be provided in person or online and shall include, but not be 18limited to: 19        (1) information provided on the provision of a medical 20    forensic examination services;21        (2) information on the use of the Illinois State 22    Police Sexual Assault Evidence Collection Kit;23        (3) information on sexual assault epidemiology, 24    neurobiology of trauma, drug-facilitated sexual assault, 25    child sexual abuse, and Illinois sexual assault-related 26    laws; and  SB1602 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1        (4) information on the hospital's sexual 2    assault-related policies and procedures.3    The online training made available by the Office of the 4Attorney General under subsection (b) of Section 10 may be 5used to comply with this subsection. 6    (a-5) A hospital must submit a plan to provide either (i) 7transfer services to all acute sexual assault survivors, (ii) 8medical forensic examinations services to all acute sexual 9assault survivors, or (iii) transfer services to pediatric 10acute sexual assault survivors and medical forensic 11examinations services to sexual assault survivors 13 years old 12or older as required in subsection (a) of this Section within 1360 days of the Department's request. Failure to submit a plan 14as described in this subsection shall subject a hospital to 15the imposition of a fine by the Department. The Department may 16impose a fine of up to $500 per day until the hospital submits 17a plan as described in this subsection. 18    (a-10) Upon receipt of a plan as described in subsection 19(a-5), the Department shall notify the hospital whether or not 20the plan is acceptable. If the Department determines that the 21plan is unacceptable, the hospital must submit a modified plan 22within 10 days of service of the notification. If the 23Department determines that the modified plan is unacceptable, 24or if the hospital fails to submit a modified plan within 10 25days, the Department may impose a fine of up to $500 per day 26until an acceptable plan has been submitted, as determined by   SB1602 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1the Department. 2    (b) An approved pediatric health care facility may provide 3medical forensic examinations services, in accordance with 4rules adopted by the Department, to acute all sexual assault 5survivors under the age of 18 who present for medical forensic 6examinations services in relation to injuries or trauma 7resulting from a sexual assault. These services shall be 8provided by a qualified medical provider. 9    A pediatric health care facility must participate in or 10submit an areawide treatment plan under Section 3 of this Act 11that includes a treatment hospital. If a pediatric health care 12facility does not provide certain medical or surgical services 13that are provided by hospitals, the areawide sexual assault 14treatment plan must include a procedure for ensuring a sexual 15assault survivor in need of such medical or surgical services 16receives the services at the treatment hospital. The areawide 17treatment plan may also include a treatment hospital with 18approved pediatric transfer.19    The Department shall review a proposed sexual assault 20treatment plan submitted by a pediatric health care facility 21within 60 days after receipt of the plan. If the Department 22finds that the proposed plan meets the minimum requirements 23set forth in Section 5 of this Act and that implementation of 24the proposed plan would provide medical forensic examinations 25services for acute sexual assault survivors under the age of 2618, then the Department shall approve the plan. If the   SB1602 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1Department does not approve a plan, then the Department shall 2notify the pediatric health care facility that the proposed 3plan has not been approved. The pediatric health care facility 4shall have 30 days to submit a revised plan. The Department 5shall review the revised plan within 30 days after receipt of 6the plan and notify the pediatric health care facility whether 7the revised plan is approved or rejected. A pediatric health 8care facility may not provide medical forensic examinations 9services to sexual assault survivors under the age of 18 who 10present with a complaint of acute sexual assault within a 11minimum of the last 7 days or who have disclosed past sexual 12assault by a specific individual and were in the care of that 13individual within a minimum of the last 7 days until the 14Department has approved a treatment plan.15    If an approved pediatric health care facility is not open 1624 hours a day, 7 days a week, it shall post signage at each 17public entrance to its facility that: 18        (1) is at least 14 inches by 14 inches in size;19        (2) directs those seeking services as follows: "If 20    closed, call 911 for services or go to the closest 21    hospital emergency department, (insert name) located at 22    (insert address).";23        (3) lists the approved pediatric health care 24    facility's hours of operation;25        (4) lists the street address of the building;26        (5) has a black background with white bold capital   SB1602 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1    lettering in a clear and easy to read font that is at least 2    72-point type, and with "call 911" in at least 125-point 3    type;4        (6) is posted clearly and conspicuously on or adjacent 5    to the door at each entrance and, if building materials 6    allow, is posted internally for viewing through glass; if 7    posted externally, the sign shall be made of 8    weather-resistant and theft-resistant materials, 9    non-removable, and adhered permanently to the building; 10    and11        (7) has lighting that is part of the sign itself or is 12    lit with a dedicated light that fully illuminates the 13    sign.14    A copy of the proposed sign must be submitted to the 15Department and approved as part of the approved pediatric 16health care facility's sexual assault treatment plan. 17    (c) Each treatment hospital, treatment hospital with 18approved pediatric transfer, and approved pediatric health 19care facility must enter into a memorandum of understanding 20with a rape crisis center for medical advocacy services, if 21these services are available to the treatment hospital, 22treatment hospital with approved pediatric transfer, or 23approved pediatric health care facility. With the consent of 24the sexual assault survivor, a rape crisis counselor shall 25remain in the exam room during the collection for forensic 26evidence.  SB1602 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1    (d) Every treatment hospital, treatment hospital with 2approved pediatric transfer, and approved pediatric health 3care facility's sexual assault treatment plan or sexual 4assault transfer plan shall include procedures for complying 5with mandatory reporting requirements pursuant to (1) the 6Abused and Neglected Child Reporting Act; (2) the Abused and 7Neglected Long Term Care Facility Residents Reporting Act; (3) 8the Adult Protective Services Act; and (iv) the Criminal 9Identification Act.10    (e) Each treatment hospital, treatment hospital with 11approved pediatric transfer, and approved pediatric health 12care facility shall submit to the Department every 6 months, 13in a manner prescribed by the Department, the following 14information: 15        (1) The total number of patients who presented with a 16    complaint of sexual assault.17        (2) The total number of Illinois State Police Sexual 18    Assault Evidence Collection Kits: 19            (A) offered to (i) all acute sexual assault 20        survivors and (ii) pediatric acute sexual assault 21        survivors pursuant to paragraph (1.5) of subsection 22        (a-5) of Section 5;23            (B) completed for (i) all acute sexual assault 24        survivors and (ii) pediatric acute sexual assault 25        survivors; and26            (C) declined by (i) all acute sexual assault   SB1602 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1        survivors and (ii) pediatric acute sexual assault 2        survivors.3    This information shall be made available on the 4Department's website.5    (f) This Section is effective on and after January 1, 2026 62024. 7(Source: P.A. 101-73, eff. 7-12-19; 101-634, eff. 6-5-20; 8102-22, eff. 6-25-21; 102-674, eff. 11-30-21; 102-1106, eff. 91-1-23.) 10    (410 ILCS 70/2.05)11    Sec. 2.05. Department requirements.12    (a) The Department shall periodically conduct on-site 13reviews of approved sexual assault treatment plans with 14hospital and approved pediatric health care facility personnel 15to ensure that the established procedures are being followed. 16Department personnel conducting the on-site reviews shall 17attend 4 hours of sexual assault training conducted by a 18qualified medical provider that includes, but is not limited 19to, forensic evidence collection provided to acute sexual 20assault survivors of any age and Illinois sexual 21assault-related laws and administrative rules.22    (b) On July 1, 2026 2019 and each July 1 thereafter, the 23Department shall submit a report to the General Assembly 24containing information on the hospitals and pediatric health 25care facilities in this State that have submitted a plan to   SB1602 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1provide: (i) transfer services to all acute sexual assault 2survivors, (ii) medical forensic examinations services to all 3acute sexual assault survivors, (iii) transfer services to 4pediatric acute sexual assault survivors and medical forensic 5examinations services to acute sexual assault survivors 13 6years old or older, or (iv) medical forensic examinations 7services to pediatric acute sexual assault survivors. The 8Department shall post the report on its Internet website on or 9before October 1, 2026 2019 and, except as otherwise provided 10in this Section, update the report every quarter thereafter. 11The report shall include all of the following:12        (1) Each hospital and pediatric care facility that has 13    submitted a plan, including the submission date of the 14    plan, type of plan submitted, and the date the plan was 15    approved or denied. If a pediatric health care facility 16    withdraws its plan, the Department shall immediately 17    update the report on its Internet website to remove the 18    pediatric health care facility's name and information.19        (2) Each hospital that has failed to submit a plan as 20    required in subsection (a) of Section 2.21        (3) Each hospital and approved pediatric care facility 22    that has to submit an acceptable Plan of Correction within 23    the time required by Section 2.1, including the date the 24    Plan of Correction was required to be submitted. Once a 25    hospital or approved pediatric health care facility 26    submits and implements the required Plan of Correction,   SB1602 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1    the Department shall immediately update the report on its 2    Internet website to reflect that hospital or approved 3    pediatric health care facility's compliance.4        (4) Each hospital and approved pediatric care facility 5    at which the periodic on-site review required by Section 6    2.05 of this Act has been conducted, including the date of 7    the on-site review and whether the hospital or approved 8    pediatric care facility was found to be in compliance with 9    its approved plan.10        (5) Each areawide treatment plan submitted to the 11    Department pursuant to Section 3 of this Act, including 12    which treatment hospitals, treatment hospitals with 13    approved pediatric transfer, transfer hospitals and 14    approved pediatric health care facilities are identified 15    in each areawide treatment plan. 16    (c) The Department, in consultation with the Office of the 17Attorney General, shall adopt administrative rules by January 181, 2020 establishing a process for physicians and physician 19assistants to provide documentation of training and clinical 20experience that meets or is substantially similar to the 21Sexual Assault Nurse Examiner Education Guidelines established 22by the International Association of Forensic Nurses in order 23to qualify as a sexual assault forensic examiner. 24    (d) This Section is effective on and after January 1, 2026 252024. 26(Source: P.A. 101-634, eff. 6-5-20; 102-22, eff. 6-25-21;   SB1602 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1102-674, eff. 11-30-21.) 2    (410 ILCS 70/2.2)3    Sec. 2.2. Emergency contraception. 4    (a) The General Assembly finds:5        (1) Crimes of sexual assault and sexual abuse cause 6    significant physical, emotional, and psychological trauma 7    to the victims. This trauma is compounded by a victim's 8    fear of becoming pregnant and bearing a child as a result 9    of the sexual assault.10        (2) Each year over 32,000 women become pregnant in the 11    United States as the result of rape and approximately 50% 12    of these pregnancies end in abortion.13        (3) As approved for use by the Federal Food and Drug 14    Administration (FDA), emergency contraception can 15    significantly reduce the risk of pregnancy if taken within 16    72 hours after the sexual assault.17        (4) By providing emergency contraception to rape 18    victims in a timely manner, the trauma of rape can be 19    significantly reduced.20    (b) Every hospital or approved pediatric health care 21facility providing services to sexual assault survivors in 22accordance with a plan approved under Section 2 must develop a 23protocol that ensures that each survivor of acute sexual 24assault will receive medically and factually accurate and 25written and oral information about emergency contraception;   SB1602 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1the indications and contraindications and risks associated 2with the use of emergency contraception; and a description of 3how and when victims may be provided emergency contraception 4at no cost upon the written order of a physician licensed to 5practice medicine in all its branches, a licensed advanced 6practice registered nurse, or a licensed physician assistant. 7The Department shall approve the protocol if it finds that the 8implementation of the protocol would provide sufficient 9protection for survivors of acute sexual assault.10    The hospital or approved pediatric health care facility 11shall implement the protocol upon approval by the Department. 12The Department shall adopt rules and regulations establishing 13one or more safe harbor protocols and setting minimum 14acceptable protocol standards that hospitals may develop and 15implement. The Department shall approve any protocol that 16meets those standards. The Department may provide a sample 17acceptable protocol upon request.18    (c) This Section is effective on and after January 1, 192024. 20(Source: P.A. 101-634, eff. 6-5-20; 102-22, eff. 6-25-21; 21102-674, eff. 11-30-21.) 22    (410 ILCS 70/3)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 87-3)23    Sec. 3. Areawide sexual assault treatment plans; 24submission. 25    (a) Hospitals and approved pediatric health care   SB1602 Enrolled- 27 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1facilities in the area to be served may develop and 2participate in areawide plans that shall describe the medical 3forensic examinations services to sexual assault survivors 4that each participating hospital and approved pediatric health 5care facility has agreed to make available. Each hospital and 6approved pediatric health care facility participating in such 7a plan shall provide such services as it is designated to 8provide in the plan agreed upon by the participants. An 9areawide plan may include treatment hospitals, treatment 10hospitals with approved pediatric transfer, transfer 11hospitals, approved pediatric health care facilities, or 12out-of-state hospitals as provided in Section 5.4. All 13areawide plans shall be submitted to the Department for 14approval, prior to becoming effective. The Department shall 15approve a proposed plan if it finds that the minimum 16requirements set forth in Section 5 and implementation of the 17plan would provide for appropriate medical forensic 18examinations services for the people of the area to be served.19    (b) This Section is effective on and after January 1, 202024. 21(Source: P.A. 101-634, eff. 6-5-20; 102-22, eff. 6-25-21; 22102-674, eff. 11-30-21.) 23    (410 ILCS 70/5)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 87-5)24    Sec. 5. Minimum requirements for medical forensic 25examinations services provided to sexual assault survivors by   SB1602 Enrolled- 28 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1hospitals and approved pediatric health care facilities.2    (a) Every hospital and approved pediatric health care 3facility providing medical forensic examinations services to 4acute sexual assault survivors under this Act shall, as 5minimum requirements for such services, provide, with the 6consent of the sexual assault survivor, and as ordered by the 7attending physician, an advanced practice registered nurse, or 8a physician assistant, the services set forth in subsection 9(a-5).10    A qualified medical provider must provide the services set 11forth in subsection (a-5) as ordered by the attending 12physician, an advanced practice registered nurse, or a 13physician assistant. 14    (a-5) A treatment hospital, a treatment hospital with 15approved pediatric transfer, or an approved pediatric health 16care facility shall provide the following services in 17accordance with subsections subsection (a) and (b): 18        (1) Appropriate medical forensic examinations services 19    without delay, in a private, age-appropriate or 20    developmentally-appropriate space, required to ensure the 21    health, safety, and welfare of a sexual assault survivor 22    and which may be used as evidence in a criminal proceeding 23    against a person accused of the sexual assault, in a 24    proceeding under the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, or in an 25    investigation under the Abused and Neglected Child 26    Reporting Act.  SB1602 Enrolled- 29 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1        Records of medical forensic examinations services, 2    including results of examinations and tests, the Illinois 3    State Police Medical Forensic Documentation Forms, the 4    Illinois State Police Patient Discharge Materials, and the 5    Illinois State Police Patient Consent: Collect and Test 6    Evidence or Collect and Hold Evidence Form, shall be 7    maintained by the hospital or approved pediatric health 8    care facility as part of the patient's electronic medical 9    record. 10        Records of medical forensic examinations services of 11    sexual assault survivors under the age of 18 shall be 12    retained by the hospital for a period of 60 years after the 13    sexual assault survivor reaches the age of 18. Records of 14    medical forensic examinations services of sexual assault 15    survivors 18 years of age or older shall be retained by the 16    hospital for a period of 20 years after the date the record 17    was created. 18        Records of medical forensic examinations services may 19    only be disseminated in accordance with Section 6.5 of 20    this Act and other State and federal law. 21        (1.5) An offer to complete the Illinois State Police 22    Sexual Assault Evidence Collection Kit for any acute 23    sexual assault survivor. If the offer to complete the 24    Illinois State Police Sexual Assault Evidence Collection 25    Kit is accepted by the survivor, then evidence collection 26    shall be completed based on the qualified medical   SB1602 Enrolled- 30 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1    provider's clinical discretion, best practices for 2    evidence collection, and information provided by the 3    sexual assault survivor. A patient may decline any portion 4    of the Illinois State Police Sexual Assault Evidence Kit, 5    but if any evidence is collected, then that shall 6    constitute evidence collection being completed for the 7    purposes of this Section and subsection (e) of Section 2. 8    Nothing in this Section is intended to prohibit a 9    qualified medical provider from offering, on the 10    provider's own accord or in response to a survivor 11    request, an Illinois State Police Sexual Assault Evidence 12    Collection Kit to a sexual assault survivor who presents 13    at a treatment hospital, treatment hospital with approved 14    pediatric transfer, or approved pediatric health care 15    facility with a nonacute complaint of sexual assault 16    according to the qualified medical provider's clinical 17    discretion based on best practices for indications for 18    evidence collection who presents within a minimum of the 19    last 7 days of the assault or who has disclosed past sexual 20    assault by a specific individual and was in the care of 21    that individual within a minimum of the last 7 days. 22            (A) Appropriate oral and written information 23        concerning evidence-based guidelines for the 24        appropriateness of evidence collection depending on 25        the sexual development of the sexual assault survivor, 26        the type of sexual assault, and the timing of the   SB1602 Enrolled- 31 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1        sexual assault shall be provided to the sexual assault 2        survivor. Evidence collection is encouraged for 3        prepubescent sexual assault survivors who present to a 4        hospital or approved pediatric health care facility 5        with a complaint of sexual assault within a minimum of 6        96 hours after the sexual assault. 7            The information required under this subparagraph 8        shall be provided in person by the qualified medical 9        provider providing medical forensic services directly 10        to the sexual assault survivor by a qualified medical 11        provider either in person or via a virtual or 12        telephone consultation.13            The written information provided shall be the 14        information created in accordance with Section 10 of 15        this Act. 16            (B) Following the discussion regarding the 17        evidence-based guidelines for evidence collection in 18        accordance with subparagraph (A), evidence collection 19        must be completed at the sexual assault survivor's 20        request. A sexual assault nurse examiner conducting an 21        examination using the Illinois State Police Sexual 22        Assault Evidence Collection Kit may do so without the 23        presence or participation of a physician.24        (2) Appropriate oral and written information 25    concerning the possibility of infection, sexually 26    transmitted infection, including an evaluation of the   SB1602 Enrolled- 32 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1    sexual assault survivor's risk of contracting human 2    immunodeficiency virus (HIV) from sexual assault, and 3    pregnancy resulting from sexual assault.4        (3) Appropriate oral and written information 5    concerning accepted medical procedures, laboratory tests, 6    medication, and possible contraindications of such 7    medication available for the prevention or treatment of 8    infection or disease resulting from sexual assault.9        (3.5) After a medical evidentiary or physical 10    examination, access to a shower at no cost, unless 11    showering facilities are unavailable.12        (4) An amount of medication, including HIV 13    prophylaxis, for treatment at the hospital or approved 14    pediatric health care facility and after discharge as is 15    deemed appropriate by the attending physician, an advanced 16    practice registered nurse, or a physician assistant in 17    accordance with the Centers for Disease Control and 18    Prevention guidelines and consistent with the hospital's 19    or approved pediatric health care facility's current 20    approved protocol for sexual assault survivors.21        (5) Photo documentation of the sexual assault 22    survivor's injuries, anatomy involved in the assault, or 23    other visible evidence on the sexual assault survivor's 24    body to supplement the medical forensic history and 25    written documentation of physical findings and evidence 26    beginning July 1, 2019. Photo documentation does not   SB1602 Enrolled- 33 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1    replace written documentation of the injury.2        (6) Written and oral instructions indicating the need 3    for follow-up examinations and laboratory tests after the 4    sexual assault to determine the presence or absence of 5    sexually transmitted infection.6        (7) Referral by hospital or approved pediatric health 7    care facility personnel for appropriate counseling.8        (8) Medical advocacy services provided by a rape 9    crisis counselor whose communications are protected under 10    Section 8-802.1 of the Code of Civil Procedure, if there 11    is a memorandum of understanding between the hospital or 12    approved pediatric health care facility and a rape crisis 13    center. With the consent of the sexual assault survivor, a 14    rape crisis counselor shall remain in the exam room during 15    the medical forensic examination. 16        (9) Written information regarding services provided by 17    a Children's Advocacy Center and rape crisis center, if 18    applicable. 19        (10) A treatment hospital, a treatment hospital with 20    approved pediatric transfer, an out-of-state hospital as 21    defined in Section 5.4, or an approved pediatric health 22    care facility shall comply with the rules relating to the 23    collection and tracking of sexual assault evidence adopted 24    by the Illinois State Police under Section 50 of the 25    Sexual Assault Evidence Submission Act. 26        (11) Written information regarding the Illinois State   SB1602 Enrolled- 34 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1    Police sexual assault evidence tracking system. 2    (a-7) Every hospital with a treatment plan approved by the 3Department and every approved pediatric health care facility 4shall employ or contract with a qualified medical provider to 5initiate a medical forensic examination services to a sexual 6assault survivor within 90 minutes of a concern arising at the 7hospital or facility of acute sexual assault the patient 8presenting to the treatment hospital or treatment hospital 9with approved pediatric transfer. The provision of a medical 10forensic examination services by a qualified medical provider 11shall not delay the provision of life-saving medical care. 12    (b) Before a medical forensic examination is provided, 13consent must be obtained in accordance with this Section. 14Evidence collection shall not be completed without first 15obtaining consent. 16        (1) Any person able to consent who is a sexual assault 17    survivor who seeks a medical forensic examination services 18    or follow-up healthcare under this Act shall be provided 19    such services without the consent of any parent, guardian, 20    custodian, surrogate, or agent. 21        (2) If a minor sexual assault survivor under the age 22    of 18 is unable to consent to a medical forensic 23    examination services, the examination services may be 24    provided with the consent of the survivor's parent, 25    guardian, or health care power of attorney and with the 26    assent of the sexual assault survivor under the Consent by   SB1602 Enrolled- 35 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1    Minors to Health Care Services Act, the Health Care 2    Surrogate Act, or other applicable State and federal laws. 3        (3) If an adult sexual assault survivor is unable to 4    consent to a medical forensic examination, the examination 5    may be provided with the consent of the survivor's 6    guardian or health care power of attorney and with the 7    assent of the sexual assault survivor. 8    (b-5) Every hospital or approved pediatric health care 9facility providing medical forensic examinations services to 10acute sexual assault survivors shall issue a voucher to any 11sexual assault survivor who is eligible to receive one in 12accordance with Section 5.2 of this Act. The hospital or 13approved pediatric health care facility shall make a copy of 14the voucher and place it in the medical record of the sexual 15assault survivor. The hospital or approved pediatric health 16care facility shall provide a copy of the voucher to the sexual 17assault survivor after discharge upon request.18    (c) Nothing in this Section creates a physician-patient 19relationship that extends beyond discharge from the hospital 20or approved pediatric health care facility. 21    (d) This Section is effective on and after January 1, 222024. 23(Source: P.A. 101-81, eff. 7-12-19; 101-377, eff. 8-16-19; 24101-634, eff. 6-5-20; 102-22, eff. 6-25-21; 102-538, eff. 258-20-21; 102-674, eff. 11-30-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 26102-1106, eff. 1-1-23.)   SB1602 Enrolled- 36 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1    (410 ILCS 70/5.1)2    Sec. 5.1. Storage, retention, and dissemination of photo 3documentation relating to medical forensic examinations 4services. 5    (a) Photo documentation taken during a medical forensic 6examination shall be maintained by the hospital or approved 7pediatric health care facility as part of the patient's 8medical record.9    Photo documentation shall be stored and backed up securely 10in its original file format in accordance with facility 11protocol. The facility protocol shall require limited access 12to the images and be included in the sexual assault treatment 13plan submitted to the Department.14    Photo documentation of a sexual assault survivor under the 15age of 18 shall be retained for a period of 60 years after the 16sexual assault survivor reaches the age of 18. Photo 17documentation of a sexual assault survivor 18 years of age or 18older shall be retained for a period of 20 years after the 19record was created.20    Photo documentation of the sexual assault survivor's 21injuries, anatomy involved in the assault, or other visible 22evidence on the sexual assault survivor's body may be used for 23peer review, expert second opinion, or in a criminal 24proceeding against a person accused of sexual assault, a 25proceeding under the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, or in an   SB1602 Enrolled- 37 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1investigation under the Abused and Neglected Child Reporting 2Act. Any dissemination of photo documentation, including for 3peer review, an expert second opinion, or in any court or 4administrative proceeding or investigation, must be in 5accordance with State and federal law. 6    (b) This Section is effective on and after January 1, 72024. 8(Source: P.A. 101-634, eff. 6-5-20; 102-22, eff. 6-25-21; 9102-674, eff. 11-30-21.) 10    (410 ILCS 70/5.2)11    Sec. 5.2. Sexual assault services voucher.12    (a) A sexual assault services voucher shall be issued by 13the a treatment hospital, treatment hospital with approved 14pediatric transfer, or approved pediatric health care facility 15where at the time a sexual assault survivor first presents 16seeking a receives medical forensic examination or medical 17care and treatment services.18    (b) Each treatment hospital, treatment hospital with 19approved pediatric transfer, and approved pediatric health 20care facility must include in its sexual assault treatment 21plan or sexual assault transfer plan submitted to the 22Department in accordance with Section 2 of this Act a protocol 23for issuing sexual assault services vouchers. The protocol 24shall, at a minimum, include the following: 25        (1) Identification of employee positions responsible   SB1602 Enrolled- 38 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1    for issuing sexual assault services vouchers.2        (2) Identification of employee positions with access 3    to the Medical Electronic Data Interchange or successor 4    system.5        (3) A statement to be signed by each employee of an 6    approved pediatric health care facility with access to the 7    Medical Electronic Data Interchange or successor system 8    affirming that the Medical Electronic Data Interchange or 9    successor system will only be used for the purpose of 10    issuing sexual assault services vouchers. 11    Every transfer hospital providing medical care and 12treatment to sexual assault survivors shall issue a voucher to 13any sexual assault survivor who is eligible to receive one. 14The transfer hospital shall make a copy of the voucher and 15place it in the medical record of the sexual assault survivor. 16The hospital shall provide a copy of the voucher to the sexual 17assault survivor prior to transfer, or after discharge upon 18request. 19    (c) A sexual assault services voucher may be used to seek 20payment for any ambulance services, medical forensic 21examination, medical care and treatment as defined by 77 Ill. 22Adm. Code Part 545 services, laboratory services, pharmacy 23services, and follow-up healthcare provided as a result of the 24sexual assault.25    (d) Any treatment hospital, treatment hospital with 26approved pediatric transfer, approved pediatric health care   SB1602 Enrolled- 39 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1facility, health care professional, ambulance provider, 2laboratory, or pharmacy may submit a bill for services 3provided to a sexual assault survivor as a result of a sexual 4assault to the Department of Healthcare and Family Services 5Sexual Assault Emergency Treatment Program. The bill shall 6include: 7        (1) the name and date of birth of the sexual assault 8    survivor;9        (2) the service provided;10        (3) the charge of service;11        (4) the date the service was provided; and12        (5) the recipient identification number, if known. 13    A health care professional, ambulance provider, 14laboratory, or pharmacy is not required to submit a copy of the 15sexual assault services voucher. 16    The Department of Healthcare and Family Services Sexual 17Assault Emergency Treatment Program shall electronically 18verify, using the Medical Electronic Data Interchange or a 19successor system, that a sexual assault services voucher was 20issued to a sexual assault survivor prior to issuing payment 21for the services.22    If a sexual assault services voucher was not issued to a 23sexual assault survivor by the treatment hospital, treatment 24hospital with approved pediatric transfer, or approved 25pediatric health care facility, then a health care 26professional, ambulance provider, laboratory, or pharmacy may   SB1602 Enrolled- 40 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1submit a request to the Department of Healthcare and Family 2Services Sexual Assault Emergency Treatment Program to issue a 3sexual assault services voucher. 4    (e) This Section is effective on and after January 1, 2026 52024. 6(Source: P.A. 101-634, eff. 6-5-20; 102-22, eff. 6-25-21; 7102-674, eff. 11-30-21.) 8    (410 ILCS 70/5.3)9    Sec. 5.3. Pediatric sexual assault care.10    (a) The General Assembly finds: 11        (1) Pediatric sexual assault survivors can suffer from 12    a wide range of health problems across their life span. In 13    addition to immediate health issues, such as sexually 14    transmitted infections, physical injuries, and 15    psychological trauma, child sexual abuse victims are at 16    greater risk for a plethora of adverse psychological and 17    somatic problems into adulthood in contrast to those who 18    were not sexually abused.19        (2) Sexual abuse against the pediatric population is 20    distinct, particularly due to their dependence on their 21    caregivers and the ability of perpetrators to manipulate 22    and silence them (especially when the perpetrators are 23    family members or other adults trusted by, or with power 24    over, children). Sexual abuse is often hidden by 25    perpetrators, unwitnessed by others, and may leave no   SB1602 Enrolled- 41 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1    obvious physical signs on child victims.2        (3) Pediatric sexual assault survivors throughout the 3    State should have access to qualified medical providers 4    who have received specialized training regarding the care 5    of pediatric sexual assault survivors within a reasonable 6    distance from their home.7        (4) There is a need in Illinois to increase the number 8    of qualified medical providers available to provide 9    medical forensic examinations services to pediatric sexual 10    assault survivors. 11    (b) If a medically stable pediatric acute sexual assault 12survivor presents at a transfer hospital or treatment hospital 13with approved pediatric transfer that has a plan approved by 14the Department requesting a medical forensic examination 15services, then the hospital emergency department staff shall 16contact an approved pediatric health care facility, if one is 17designated in the hospital's plan, then the patient and 18non-offending parent or legal guardian shall be given the 19option to transfer to the approved pediatric health care 20facility during posted hours of operation or a treatment 21hospital. 22    If the transferring hospital confirms that medical 23forensic services can be initiated within 90 minutes of the 24patient's arrival at the approved pediatric health care 25facility following an immediate transfer, then the hospital 26emergency department staff shall notify the patient and   SB1602 Enrolled- 42 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1non-offending parent or legal guardian that the patient will 2be transferred for medical forensic services and shall provide 3the patient and non-offending parent or legal guardian the 4option of being transferred to the approved pediatric health 5care facility or the treatment hospital designated in the 6hospital's plan. The pediatric sexual assault survivor may be 7transported by ambulance, law enforcement, or personal 8vehicle.9    If medical forensic services cannot be initiated within 90 10minutes of the patient's arrival at the approved pediatric 11health care facility, there is no approved pediatric health 12care facility designated in the hospital's plan, or the 13patient or non-offending parent or legal guardian chooses to 14be transferred to a treatment hospital, the hospital emergency 15department staff shall contact a treatment hospital designated 16in the hospital's plan to arrange for the transfer of the 17patient to the treatment hospital for medical forensic 18services, which are to be initiated within 90 minutes of the 19patient's arrival at the treatment hospital. The treatment 20hospital shall provide medical forensic services and may not 21transfer the patient to another facility. The pediatric sexual 22assault survivor may be transported by ambulance, law 23enforcement, or personal vehicle. 24    (c) When a qualified medical provider who is qualified to 25treat pediatric survivors of sexual assault is available, a 26treatment hospital with approved pediatric transfer may offer   SB1602 Enrolled- 43 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1medical forensic examinations to pediatric acute sexual 2assault survivors subject to prior approval from the 3Department. Prior to granting approval, the Department shall 4(i) confirm the treatment hospital with approved pediatric 5transfer is working toward becoming a treatment hospital and 6(ii) consult with the treatment hospital that receives acute 7pediatric sexual assault survivors from the treatment hospital 8with approved pediatric transfer pursuant to the plan approved 9by the Department. Department approval under this Section is 10valid for one year and may be renewed. If a medically stable 11pediatric sexual assault survivor presents at a treatment 12hospital that has a plan approved by the Department requesting 13medical forensic services, then the hospital emergency 14department staff shall contact an approved pediatric health 15care facility, if one is designated in the treatment 16hospital's areawide treatment plan. 17    If medical forensic services can be initiated within 90 18minutes after the patient's arrival at the approved pediatric 19health care facility following an immediate transfer, the 20hospital emergency department staff shall provide the patient 21and non-offending parent or legal guardian the option of 22having medical forensic services performed at the treatment 23hospital or at the approved pediatric health care facility. If 24the patient or non-offending parent or legal guardian chooses 25to be transferred, the pediatric sexual assault survivor may 26be transported by ambulance, law enforcement, or personal   SB1602 Enrolled- 44 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1vehicle.2    If medical forensic services cannot be initiated within 90 3minutes after the patient's arrival to the approved pediatric 4health care facility, there is no approved pediatric health 5care facility designated in the hospital's plan, or the 6patient or non-offending parent or legal guardian chooses not 7to be transferred, the hospital shall provide medical forensic 8services to the patient. 9    (d) If the patient or non-offending parent or legal 10guardian chooses to be transferred to an approved pediatric 11health care facility pursuant to subsection (b) or (c), then 12the hospital emergency department staff shall contact the 13approved pediatric health care facility to arrange the 14transfer. The pediatric sexual assault survivor and 15non-offending parent or legal guardian may be transported by 16ambulance, law enforcement, or personal vehicle. A medical 17forensic examination shall be initiated within 90 minutes of 18the acute sexual assault survivor's arrival at the approved 19pediatric health care facility following an immediate transfer 20during posted hours of operation.21    (e) (d) If a pediatric acute sexual assault survivor 22presents at an approved pediatric health care facility 23requesting medical forensic services or the facility is 24contacted by law enforcement or the Department of Children and 25Family Services requesting a medical forensic examination 26services for a pediatric acute sexual assault survivor during   SB1602 Enrolled- 45 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1posted hours of operation, then the medical forensic 2examination services shall be provided at the facility if the 3medical forensic services can be initiated within 90 minutes 4after the patient's arrival at the facility. If medical 5forensic services cannot be initiated within 90 minutes after 6the patient's arrival at the facility, then the patient shall 7be transferred to a treatment hospital designated in the 8approved pediatric health care facility's plan for medical 9forensic services. The pediatric sexual assault survivor may 10be transported by ambulance, law enforcement, or personal 11vehicle. 12    (f) (e) This Section is effective on and after January 1, 132024. 14(Source: P.A. 101-634, eff. 6-5-20; 102-22, eff. 6-25-21; 15102-674, eff. 11-30-21.) 16    (410 ILCS 70/5.4)17    Sec. 5.4. Out-of-state hospitals.18    (a) Nothing in this Section shall prohibit the transfer of 19a patient in need of medical services from a hospital that has 20been designated as a trauma center by the Department in 21accordance with Section 3.90 of the Emergency Medical Services 22(EMS) Systems Act.23    (b) A transfer hospital, treatment hospital with approved 24pediatric transfer, or approved pediatric health care facility 25may transfer a sexual assault survivor to an out-of-state   SB1602 Enrolled- 46 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1hospital that is located in a county that borders Illinois if 2the out-of-state hospital: (1) submits an areawide treatment 3plan approved by the Department; and (2) has certified the 4following to the Department in a form and manner prescribed by 5the Department that the out-of-state hospital will: 6        (i) consent to the jurisdiction of the Department in 7    accordance with Section 2.06 of this Act;8        (ii) comply with all requirements of this Act 9    applicable to treatment hospitals, including, but not 10    limited to, offering evidence collection to any Illinois 11    sexual assault survivor who presents with a complaint of 12    acute sexual assault within a minimum of the last 7 days or 13    who has disclosed past sexual assault by a specific 14    individual and was in the care of that individual within a 15    minimum of the last 7 days and not billing the sexual 16    assault survivor for the medical forensic examination 17    services or 180 days of follow-up healthcare;18        (iii) use an Illinois State Police Sexual Assault 19    Evidence Collection Kit to collect forensic evidence from 20    an Illinois acute sexual assault survivor;21        (iv) ensure its staff cooperates with Illinois law 22    enforcement agencies and are responsive to subpoenas 23    issued by Illinois courts; and24        (v) provide appropriate transportation upon the 25    completion of a medical forensic examination services back 26    to the transfer hospital or treatment hospital with   SB1602 Enrolled- 47 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1    pediatric transfer where the sexual assault survivor 2    initially presented seeking a medical forensic examination 3    services, unless the sexual assault survivor chooses to 4    arrange his or her own transportation.5    (c) Subsection (b) of this Section is inoperative on and 6after January 1, 2029. 7(Source: P.A. 102-1097, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1106, eff. 1-1-23; 8103-154, eff. 6-30-23.) 9    (410 ILCS 70/5.5)10    Sec. 5.5. Minimum reimbursement requirements for follow-up 11healthcare.12    (a) Every hospital, pediatric health care facility, health 13care professional, laboratory, or pharmacy that provides 14follow-up healthcare to a sexual assault survivor, with the 15consent of the sexual assault survivor and as ordered by the 16attending physician, an advanced practice registered nurse, or 17physician assistant shall be reimbursed for the follow-up 18healthcare services provided. Follow-up healthcare services 19include, but are not limited to, the following:20        (1) a physical examination;21        (2) laboratory tests to determine the presence or 22    absence of sexually transmitted infection; and23        (3) appropriate medications, including HIV 24    prophylaxis, in accordance with the Centers for Disease 25    Control and Prevention's guidelines.  SB1602 Enrolled- 48 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1    (b) Reimbursable follow-up healthcare is limited to office 2visits with a physician, advanced practice registered nurse, 3or physician assistant within 180 days after an initial visit 4as a result of the sexual assault for hospital medical 5forensic services.6    (c) Nothing in this Section requires a hospital, pediatric 7health care facility, health care professional, laboratory, or 8pharmacy to provide follow-up healthcare to a sexual assault 9survivor.10    (d) This Section is effective on and after January 1, 112024. 12(Source: P.A. 101-634, eff. 6-5-20; 102-22, eff. 6-25-21; 13102-674, eff. 11-30-21; 102-1097, eff. 1-1-23.) 14    (410 ILCS 70/6.2)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 87-6.2)15    Sec. 6.2. Assistance and grants. 16    (a) The Department shall assist in the development and 17operation of programs which provide medical forensic 18examinations services to sexual assault survivors, and, where 19necessary, to provide grants to hospitals and approved 20pediatric health care facilities for this purpose.21    (b) This Section is effective on and after January 1, 222024. 23(Source: P.A. 101-634, eff. 6-5-20; 102-22, eff. 6-25-21; 24102-674, eff. 11-30-21.)   SB1602 Enrolled- 49 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1    (410 ILCS 70/6.5)2    Sec. 6.5. Written consent to the release of sexual assault 3evidence for testing.4    (a) Upon the completion of a medical forensic examination 5services, the health care professional providing the medical 6forensic examination services shall provide the patient the 7opportunity to sign a written consent to allow law enforcement 8to submit the sexual assault evidence for testing, if 9collected. The written consent shall be on a form included in 10the sexual assault evidence collection kit and posted on the 11Illinois State Police website. The consent form shall include 12whether the survivor consents to the release of information 13about the sexual assault to law enforcement.14        (1) A survivor 13 years of age or older may sign the 15    written consent to release the evidence for testing.16        (2) If the survivor is a minor who is under 13 years of 17    age, the written consent to release the sexual assault 18    evidence for testing may be signed by the parent, 19    guardian, or agent acting under a health care power of 20    attorney. If a parent, guardian, or health care power of 21    attorney is not available or unwilling to release 22    evidence, then a State's Attorney or the Attorney General 23    may petition the court to authorize its release for 24    testing investigating law enforcement officer, or 25    Department of Children and Family Services.26        (3) If the survivor is an adult who has a guardian of   SB1602 Enrolled- 50 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1    the person, a health care surrogate, or an agent acting 2    under a health care power of attorney, the consent of the 3    guardian, surrogate, or agent is not required to release 4    evidence and information concerning the sexual assault or 5    sexual abuse. If the adult is unable to provide consent 6    for the release of evidence and information and a 7    guardian, surrogate, or agent under a health care power of 8    attorney is unavailable or unwilling to release the 9    information, then an investigating law enforcement officer 10    may authorize the release.11        (4) Any health care professional or health care 12    institution, including any hospital or approved pediatric 13    health care facility, who provides evidence or information 14    to a law enforcement officer under a written consent as 15    specified in this Section is immune from any civil or 16    professional liability that might arise from those 17    actions, with the exception of willful or wanton 18    misconduct. The immunity provision applies only if all of 19    the requirements of this Section are met.20    (b) The hospital or approved pediatric health care 21facility shall keep a copy of a signed or unsigned written 22consent form in the patient's medical record.23    (c) If a written consent to allow law enforcement to hold 24the sexual assault evidence is signed at the completion of the 25medical forensic examination services, the hospital or 26approved pediatric health care facility shall include the   SB1602 Enrolled- 51 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1following information in its discharge instructions:2        (1) the sexual assault evidence will be stored for 10 3    years from the completion of an Illinois State Police 4    Sexual Assault Evidence Collection Kit, or 10 years from 5    the age of 18 years, whichever is longer;6        (2) a person authorized to consent to the testing of 7    the sexual assault evidence may sign a written consent to 8    allow law enforcement to test the sexual assault evidence 9    at any time during that 10-year period for an adult 10    victim, or until a minor victim turns 28 years of age by 11    (A) contacting the law enforcement agency having 12    jurisdiction, or if unknown, the law enforcement agency 13    contacted by the hospital or approved pediatric health 14    care facility under Section 3.2 of the Criminal 15    Identification Act; or (B) by working with an advocate at 16    a rape crisis center;17        (3) the name, address, and phone number of the law 18    enforcement agency having jurisdiction, or if unknown the 19    name, address, and phone number of the law enforcement 20    agency contacted by the hospital or approved pediatric 21    health care facility under Section 3.2 of the Criminal 22    Identification Act; and23        (4) the name and phone number of a local rape crisis 24    center.25    (d) This Section is effective on and after January 1, 262024.   SB1602 Enrolled- 52 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1(Source: P.A. 101-81, eff. 7-12-19; 101-634, eff. 6-5-20; 2102-22, eff. 6-25-21; 102-674, eff. 11-30-21.) 3    (410 ILCS 70/6.6)4    Sec. 6.6. Submission of sexual assault evidence.5    (a) As soon as practicable, but in no event more than 4 6hours after the completion of a medical forensic examination 7services, the hospital or approved pediatric health care 8facility shall make reasonable efforts to determine the law 9enforcement agency having jurisdiction where the sexual 10assault occurred, if sexual assault evidence was collected. 11The hospital or approved pediatric health care facility may 12obtain the name of the law enforcement agency with 13jurisdiction from the local law enforcement agency.14    (b) Within 4 hours after the completion of a medical 15forensic examination services, the hospital or approved 16pediatric health care facility shall notify the law 17enforcement agency having jurisdiction that the hospital or 18approved pediatric health care facility is in possession of 19sexual assault evidence and the date and time the collection 20of evidence was completed. The hospital or approved pediatric 21health care facility shall document the notification in the 22patient's medical records and shall include the agency 23notified, the date and time of the notification and the name of 24the person who received the notification. This notification to 25the law enforcement agency having jurisdiction satisfies the   SB1602 Enrolled- 53 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1hospital's or approved pediatric health care facility's 2requirement to contact its local law enforcement agency under 3Section 3.2 of the Criminal Identification Act.4    (c) If the law enforcement agency having jurisdiction has 5not taken physical custody of sexual assault evidence within 5 6days of the first contact by the hospital or approved 7pediatric health care facility, the hospital or approved 8pediatric health care facility shall renotify the law 9enforcement agency having jurisdiction that the hospital or 10approved pediatric health care facility is in possession of 11sexual assault evidence and the date the sexual assault 12evidence was collected. The hospital or approved pediatric 13health care facility shall document the renotification in the 14patient's medical records and shall include the agency 15notified, the date and time of the notification and the name of 16the person who received the notification.17    (d) If the law enforcement agency having jurisdiction has 18not taken physical custody of the sexual assault evidence 19within 10 days of the first contact by the hospital or approved 20pediatric health care facility and the hospital or approved 21pediatric health care facility has provided renotification 22under subsection (c) of this Section, the hospital or approved 23pediatric health care facility shall contact the State's 24Attorney of the county where the law enforcement agency having 25jurisdiction is located. The hospital or approved pediatric 26health care facility shall inform the State's Attorney that   SB1602 Enrolled- 54 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1the hospital or approved pediatric health care facility is in 2possession of sexual assault evidence, the date the sexual 3assault evidence was collected, the law enforcement agency 4having jurisdiction, the dates, times and names of persons 5notified under subsections (b) and (c) of this Section. The 6notification shall be made within 14 days of the collection of 7the sexual assault evidence.8    (e) This Section is effective on and after January 1, 92024. 10(Source: P.A. 101-634, eff. 6-5-20; 102-22, eff. 6-25-21; 11102-674, eff. 11-30-21.) 12    (410 ILCS 70/7)13    Sec. 7. Reimbursement. 14    (a) A hospital, approved pediatric health care facility, 15or health care professional furnishing medical forensic 16examinations, medical care and treatment as defined by 77 Ill. 17Adm. Code Part 545 services, an ambulance provider furnishing 18transportation to a sexual assault survivor, a hospital, 19health care professional, or laboratory providing follow-up 20healthcare, or a pharmacy dispensing prescribed medications to 21any sexual assault survivor shall furnish such services or 22medications to that person without charge and shall seek 23payment as follows:24        (1) If a sexual assault survivor is eligible to 25    receive benefits under the medical assistance program   SB1602 Enrolled- 55 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1    under Article V of the Illinois Public Aid Code, the 2    ambulance provider, hospital, approved pediatric health 3    care facility, health care professional, laboratory, or 4    pharmacy must submit the bill to the Department of 5    Healthcare and Family Services or the appropriate Medicaid 6    managed care organization and accept the amount paid as 7    full payment.8        (2) If a sexual assault survivor is covered by one or 9    more policies of health insurance or is a beneficiary 10    under a public or private health coverage program, the 11    ambulance provider, hospital, approved pediatric health 12    care facility, health care professional, laboratory, or 13    pharmacy shall bill the insurance company or program. With 14    respect to such insured patients, applicable deductible, 15    co-pay, co-insurance, denial of claim, or any other 16    out-of-pocket insurance-related expense may be submitted 17    to the Illinois Sexual Assault Emergency Treatment Program 18    of the Department of Healthcare and Family Services in 19    accordance with 89 Ill. Adm. Code 148.510 for payment at 20    the Department of Healthcare and Family Services' 21    allowable rates under the Illinois Public Aid Code. The 22    ambulance provider, hospital, approved pediatric health 23    care facility, health care professional, laboratory, or 24    pharmacy shall accept the amounts paid by the insurance 25    company or health coverage program and the Illinois Sexual 26    Assault Treatment Program as full payment.  SB1602 Enrolled- 56 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1        (3) If a sexual assault survivor (i) is neither 2    eligible to receive benefits under the medical assistance 3    program under Article V of the Illinois Public Aid Code 4    nor covered by a policy of insurance or a public or private 5    health coverage program or (ii) opts out of billing a 6    private insurance provider, as permitted under subsection 7    (a-5) of Section 7.5, the ambulance provider, hospital, 8    approved pediatric health care facility, health care 9    professional, laboratory, or pharmacy shall submit the 10    request for reimbursement to the Illinois Sexual Assault 11    Emergency Treatment Program under the Department of 12    Healthcare and Family Services in accordance with 89 Ill. 13    Adm. Code 148.510 at the Department of Healthcare and 14    Family Services' allowable rates under the Illinois Public 15    Aid Code.16        (4) If a sexual assault survivor presents a sexual 17    assault services voucher for follow-up healthcare, the 18    healthcare professional, pediatric health care facility, 19    or laboratory that provides follow-up healthcare or the 20    pharmacy that dispenses prescribed medications to a sexual 21    assault survivor shall submit the request for 22    reimbursement for follow-up healthcare, pediatric health 23    care facility, laboratory, or pharmacy services to the 24    Illinois Sexual Assault Emergency Treatment Program under 25    the Department of Healthcare and Family Services in 26    accordance with 89 Ill. Adm. Code 148.510 at the   SB1602 Enrolled- 57 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1    Department of Healthcare and Family Services' allowable 2    rates under the Illinois Public Aid Code. Nothing in this 3    subsection (a) precludes hospitals or approved pediatric 4    health care facilities from providing follow-up healthcare 5    and receiving reimbursement under this Section. 6    (b) Nothing in this Section precludes a hospital, health 7care provider, ambulance provider, laboratory, or pharmacy 8from billing the sexual assault survivor or any applicable 9health insurance or coverage for inpatient services.10    (b-5) Medical forensic examinations services furnished by 11a qualified medical provider person or entity described under 12subsection (a) to any sexual assault survivor on or after July 131, 2022 that are required under this Act to be reimbursed by 14the Department of Healthcare and Family Services, the Illinois 15Sexual Assault Emergency Treatment Program under the 16Department of Healthcare and Family Services, or the 17appropriate Medicaid managed care organization shall be 18reimbursed at a rate of at least $1,000 or at allowable rates 19under the Illinois Public Aid Code, whichever is greater. 20    (b-7) Medical care and treatment as defined by 77 Ill. 21Adm. Code Part 545 furnished to any sexual assault survivor to 22be reimbursed by the Department of Healthcare and Family 23Services, the Illinois Sexual Assault Emergency Treatment 24Program under the Department of Healthcare and Family 25Services, or the appropriate Medicaid managed care 26organization shall be reimbursed at allowable rates under the   SB1602 Enrolled- 58 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1Illinois Public Aid Code. 2    (c) (Blank).3    (d) (Blank). 4    (e) The Department of Healthcare and Family Services shall 5establish standards, rules, and regulations to implement this 6Section. 7    (f) This Section is effective on and after January 1, 82024. 9(Source: P.A. 102-22, eff. 6-25-21; 102-674, eff. 11-30-21; 10102-699, Article 30, Section 30-5, eff. 4-19-22; 102-699, 11Article 35, Section 35-5 (See Section 99-99 of P.A. 102-699 12and Section 99 of P.A. 102-1097 regarding the effective date 13of changes made in Article 35 of P.A. 102-699); 103-154, eff. 146-30-23.) 15    (410 ILCS 70/7.5)16    Sec. 7.5. Prohibition on billing sexual assault survivors 17directly for certain services; written notice; billing 18protocols.19    (a) A hospital, approved pediatric health care facility, 20health care professional, ambulance provider, laboratory, or 21pharmacy furnishing a medical forensic examination services, 22medical care and treatment as defined by 77 Ill. Adm. Code Part 23545 transportation, follow-up healthcare, or medication to a 24sexual assault survivor shall not: 25        (1) charge or submit a bill for any portion of the   SB1602 Enrolled- 59 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1    costs of the services, transportation, or medications to 2    the sexual assault survivor, including any insurance 3    deductible, co-pay, co-insurance, denial of claim by an 4    insurer, spenddown, or any other out-of-pocket expense;5        (2) communicate with, harass, or intimidate the sexual 6    assault survivor for payment of services, including, but 7    not limited to, repeatedly calling or writing to the 8    sexual assault survivor and threatening to refer the 9    matter to a debt collection agency or to an attorney for 10    collection, enforcement, or filing of other process;11        (3) refer a bill to a collection agency or attorney 12    for collection action against the sexual assault survivor;13        (4) contact or distribute information to affect the 14    sexual assault survivor's credit rating; or15        (5) take any other action adverse to the sexual 16    assault survivor or his or her family on account of 17    providing services to the sexual assault survivor.18    (a-5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 19including, but not limited to, subsection (a), a sexual 20assault survivor who is not the subscriber or primary 21policyholder of the sexual assault survivor's insurance policy 22may opt out of billing the sexual assault survivor's private 23insurance provider. If the sexual assault survivor opts out of 24billing the sexual assault survivor's private insurance 25provider, then the bill for the medical forensic examination 26services shall be sent to the Department of Healthcare and   SB1602 Enrolled- 60 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1Family Services' Sexual Assault Emergency Treatment Program 2for reimbursement for the services provided to the sexual 3assault survivor. 4    (b) Nothing in this Section precludes a hospital, health 5care provider, ambulance provider, laboratory, or pharmacy 6from billing the sexual assault survivor or any applicable 7health insurance or coverage for inpatient services.8    (c) Every hospital and approved pediatric health care 9facility with a sexual assault treatment plan or sexual 10assault transfer plan providing treatment services to sexual 11assault survivors in accordance with a plan approved by the 12Department under Section 2 of this Act shall provide a written 13notice to a sexual assault survivor. The written notice must 14include, but is not limited to, the following:15        (1) a statement that the sexual assault survivor 16    should not be directly billed by any ambulance provider 17    providing transportation services, or by any hospital, 18    approved pediatric health care facility, health care 19    professional, laboratory, or pharmacy for the services the 20    sexual assault survivor received as an outpatient at the 21    hospital or approved pediatric health care facility;22        (2) a statement that a sexual assault survivor who is 23    admitted to a hospital may be billed for inpatient 24    services provided by a hospital, health care professional, 25    laboratory, or pharmacy;26        (3) a statement that prior to leaving the hospital or   SB1602 Enrolled- 61 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1    approved pediatric health care facility, the hospital or 2    approved pediatric health care facility will give the 3    sexual assault survivor a sexual assault services voucher 4    for follow-up healthcare if the sexual assault survivor is 5    eligible to receive a sexual assault services voucher;6        (4) the definition of "follow-up healthcare" as set 7    forth in Section 1a of this Act;8        (5) (blank); a phone number the sexual assault 9    survivor may call should the sexual assault survivor 10    receive a bill from the hospital or approved pediatric 11    health care facility for medical forensic services;12        (6) the toll-free phone number of the Office of the 13    Illinois Attorney General's Health Care Bureau General, 14    which the sexual assault survivor may call should the 15    sexual assault survivor receive a bill from an ambulance 16    provider, approved pediatric health care facility, a 17    health care professional, a laboratory, or a pharmacy.18    This subsection (c) shall not apply to hospitals that 19provide transfer services as defined under Section 1a of this 20Act.21    (d) Within 60 days after the effective date of this 22amendatory Act of the 99th General Assembly, every health care 23professional, except for those employed by a hospital or 24hospital affiliate, as defined in the Hospital Licensing Act, 25or those employed by a hospital operated under the University 26of Illinois Hospital Act, who bills separately for medical or   SB1602 Enrolled- 62 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1forensic services must develop a billing protocol that ensures 2that no survivor of sexual assault will be sent a bill for any 3medical forensic services and submit the billing protocol to 4the Office of the Attorney General for approval. Within 60 5days after the commencement of the provision of medical 6forensic services, every health care professional, except for 7those employed by a hospital or hospital affiliate, as defined 8in the Hospital Licensing Act, or those employed by a hospital 9operated under the University of Illinois Hospital Act, who 10bills separately for medical or forensic services must develop 11a billing protocol that ensures that no survivor of sexual 12assault is sent a bill for any medical forensic services and 13submit the billing protocol to the Attorney General for 14approval. Health care professionals who bill as a legal entity 15may submit a single billing protocol for the billing entity. 16    Within 60 days after the Department's approval of a 17treatment plan, a hospital or an approved pediatric health 18care facility and any health care professional employed by an 19approved pediatric health care facility must develop a billing 20protocol that ensures that no survivor of sexual assault is 21sent a bill for any medical forensic examination services and 22submit the billing protocol to the Office of the Attorney 23General for approval.24     The billing protocol must include at a minimum:25        (1) (blank); a description of training for persons who 26    prepare bills for medical and forensic services;  SB1602 Enrolled- 63 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1        (2) (blank); a written acknowledgement signed by a 2    person who has completed the training that the person will 3    not bill survivors of sexual assault;4        (3) prohibitions on submitting any bill for any 5    portion of the medical forensic examination services 6    provided to a survivor of sexual assault to a collection 7    agency; 8        (4) (blank); prohibitions on taking any action that 9    would adversely affect the credit of the survivor of 10    sexual assault;11        (5) (blank); the termination of all collection 12    activities if the protocol is violated; and13        (6) the actions to be taken if a bill is sent to a 14    collection agency or the failure to pay is reported to any 15    credit reporting agency; and .16        (7) protocols and procedures for compliance with 17    subsections (a), (a-5), and (c) of this Section.18    Upon request, the Department of Healthcare and Family 19Services The Office of the Attorney General may provide 20assistance to hospitals and approved pediatric health care 21facilities developing billing protocols a sample acceptable 22billing protocol upon request.23    A hospital or approved pediatric health care facility 24shall provide a copy of its billing protocol upon request The 25Office of the Attorney General shall approve a proposed 26protocol if it finds that the implementation of the protocol   SB1602 Enrolled- 64 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1would result in no survivor of sexual assault being billed or 2sent a bill for medical forensic services.3    If the Office of the Attorney General determines that 4implementation of the protocol could result in the billing of 5a survivor of sexual assault for medical forensic services, 6the Office of the Attorney General shall provide the health 7care professional or approved pediatric health care facility 8with a written statement of the deficiencies in the protocol. 9The health care professional or approved pediatric health care 10facility shall have 30 days to submit a revised billing 11protocol addressing the deficiencies to the Office of the 12Attorney General. The health care professional or approved 13pediatric health care facility shall implement the protocol 14upon approval by the Office of the Attorney General.15    The health care professional or approved pediatric health 16care facility shall submit any proposed revision to or 17modification of an approved billing protocol to the Office of 18the Attorney General for approval. The health care 19professional or approved pediatric health care facility shall 20implement the revised or modified billing protocol upon 21approval by the Office of the Illinois Attorney General.22    (e) This Section is effective on and after January 1, 232024. 24(Source: P.A. 101-634, eff. 6-5-20; 101-652, eff. 7-1-21; 25102-22, eff. 6-25-21; 102-674, eff. 11-30-21; 102-1097, eff. 261-1-23.)   SB1602 Enrolled- 65 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1    (410 ILCS 70/8)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 87-8)2    Sec. 8. Violations and penalties Penalties. 3    (a) The Department shall implement a complaint system 4through which the Department may receive complaints of 5violations of this Act. The Department may use an existing 6complaint system to fulfill the requirements of this Section.7    (b) The Department may work with the Attorney General to 8verify complaints that the Attorney General's Office Health 9Care Bureau has received as set forth in Section 7.5. 10    (c) After receiving a complaint, the Department shall 11determine whether the hospital or approved pediatric health 12care facility is not in compliance with its approved plan or if 13a violation of any provision of this Act or rules adopted under 14this Act has occurred. Upon determining a violation of any 15provision of this Act or rules adopted under this Act has 16occurred, the Department shall issue a written notice of 17violation that includes the specific items of noncompliance to 18the hospital or approved pediatric health care facility.19    (d) The hospital shall have 10 business days to submit to 20the Department a plan of correction that contains the 21hospital's or approved pediatric health care facility's 22specific proposals for correcting the items of noncompliance. 23The Department shall review the plan of correction and notify 24the hospital in writing within 10 business days as to whether 25the plan is acceptable or unacceptable. If the Department   SB1602 Enrolled- 66 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1finds the plan of correction unacceptable, the hospital or 2approved pediatric health care facility shall have 10 business 3days to resubmit an acceptable plan of correction. Upon 4notification that its plan of correction is acceptable, a 5hospital or approved pediatric health care facility shall 6implement the plan of correction within 60 days. The 7Department may conduct additional surveys or request 8documentation from the hospital or approved pediatric health 9care facility, as necessary, to ensure compliance with the 10accepted plan of correction.11    (e) If the hospital or approved pediatric health care 12facility fails to submit an acceptable plan of correction or 13implement an accepted plan of correction within the time 14frames required in this Section, the Department may impose a 15fine as follows: 16        (1) at least $1,500 but less than $3,000 for a first 17    violation; and18        (2) at least $3,000 but less than $5,000 for a second 19    or subsequent violation.20    (f) In imposing a fine, the Department shall consider the 21following factors:22        (1) the alleged violation or violations and the 23    adequacy of the response by the hospital or pediatric 24    facility;25        (2) any historical pattern or practice of 26    noncompliance with this Act;  SB1602 Enrolled- 67 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1        (3) the number of patients seeking treatment and 2    support from the hospital or pediatric facility affected 3    by the violation.4    (g) The Department's notice of violation shall include, at 5a minimum, the following:6        (1) the hospital or approved pediatric health care 7    facility's right to request an administrative hearing to 8    contest the Department's notice of violation;9        (2) an opportunity to present evidence, orally, in 10    writing, or both, on the question of the alleged violation 11    before an administrative law judge; and12        (3) an opportunity to file an answer responding to the 13    Department's notice of violation.14    (h) The Department shall follow all rules of practice and 15procedure for hearings conducted under this Section pursuant 16to 77 Ill. Adm. Code Part 100. After an administrative hearing 17before an administrative law judge or hearing officer, the 18Director shall issue a final written decision, or a final 19order, based on the administrative law judge's findings of 20fact, conclusions of law, and recommendation. The final order 21shall also include the monetary penalty against such hospital 22or pediatric facility. 23    (i) The Attorney General may bring an action in the 24circuit court to enforce the collection of a monetary penalty 25imposed under this Section.26    (j) The fines under this Section shall be deposited into   SB1602 Enrolled- 68 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1the Sexual Assault Services Fund. Any hospital or approved 2pediatric health care facility violating any provisions of 3this Act other than Section 7.5 shall be guilty of a petty 4offense for each violation, and any fine imposed shall be paid 5into the general corporate funds of the city, incorporated 6town or village in which the hospital or approved pediatric 7health care facility is located, or of the county, in case such 8hospital is outside the limits of any incorporated 9municipality. 10    (b) The Attorney General may seek the assessment of one or 11more of the following civil monetary penalties in any action 12filed under this Act where the hospital, approved pediatric 13health care facility, health care professional, ambulance 14provider, laboratory, or pharmacy knowingly violates Section 157.5 of the Act: 16        (1) For willful violations of paragraphs (1), (2), 17    (4), or (5) of subsection (a) of Section 7.5 or subsection 18    (c) of Section 7.5, the civil monetary penalty shall not 19    exceed $500 per violation.20        (2) For violations of paragraphs (1), (2), (4), or (5) 21    of subsection (a) of Section 7.5 or subsection (c) of 22    Section 7.5 involving a pattern or practice, the civil 23    monetary penalty shall not exceed $500 per violation.24        (3) For violations of paragraph (3) of subsection (a) 25    of Section 7.5, the civil monetary penalty shall not 26    exceed $500 for each day the bill is with a collection   SB1602 Enrolled- 69 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1    agency.2        (4) For violations involving the failure to submit 3    billing protocols within the time period required under 4    subsection (d) of Section 7.5, the civil monetary penalty 5    shall not exceed $100 per day until the health care 6    professional or approved pediatric health care facility 7    complies with subsection (d) of Section 7.5.8    All civil monetary penalties shall be deposited into the 9Violent Crime Victims Assistance Fund.10    (k) (c) This Section is effective on and after January 1, 112024. 12(Source: P.A. 101-634, eff. 6-5-20; 102-22, eff. 6-25-21; 13102-674, eff. 11-30-21.) 14    (410 ILCS 70/10)15    Sec. 10. Sexual Assault Nurse Examiner Program.16    (a) The Sexual Assault Nurse Examiner Program is 17established within the Office of the Attorney General. The 18Sexual Assault Nurse Examiner Program shall maintain a list of 19sexual assault nurse examiners who have completed didactic and 20clinical training requirements consistent with the Sexual 21Assault Nurse Examiner Education Guidelines established by the 22International Association of Forensic Nurses.23    (b) By March 1, 2019, the Sexual Assault Nurse Examiner 24Program shall develop and make available to hospitals 2 hours 25of online sexual assault training for emergency department   SB1602 Enrolled- 70 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1clinical staff to meet the training requirement established in 2subsection (a) of Section 2. Notwithstanding any other law 3regarding ongoing licensure requirements, such training shall 4count toward the continuing medical education and continuing 5nursing education credits for physicians, physician 6assistants, advanced practice registered nurses, and 7registered professional nurses.8    The Sexual Assault Nurse Examiner Program shall provide 9didactic and clinical training opportunities consistent with 10the Sexual Assault Nurse Examiner Education Guidelines 11established by the International Association of Forensic 12Nurses, in sufficient numbers and geographical locations 13across the State, to assist hospitals with training the 14necessary number of sexual assault nurse examiners to comply 15with the requirement of this Act to employ or contract with a 16qualified medical provider to initiate a medical forensic 17examination services to a sexual assault survivor within 90 18minutes of the patient presenting to the hospital as required 19in subsection (a-7) of Section 5.20    The Sexual Assault Nurse Examiner Program shall assist 21hospitals in establishing trainings to achieve the 22requirements of this Act.23    For the purpose of providing continuing medical education 24credit in accordance with the Medical Practice Act of 1987 and 25administrative rules adopted under the Medical Practice Act of 261987 and continuing education credit in accordance with the   SB1602 Enrolled- 71 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1Nurse Practice Act and administrative rules adopted under the 2Nurse Practice Act to health care professionals for the 3completion of sexual assault training provided by the Sexual 4Assault Nurse Examiner Program under this Act, the Office of 5the Attorney General shall be considered a State agency. 6    (c) The Sexual Assault Nurse Examiner Program, in 7consultation with qualified medical providers, shall create 8uniform materials that all hospitals treatment hospitals, 9treatment hospitals with approved pediatric transfer, and 10approved pediatric health care facilities are required to give 11patients and non-offending parents or legal guardians, if 12applicable, regarding the medical forensic exam procedure, 13laws regarding consenting to medical forensic examinations 14services, and the benefits and risks of evidence collection, 15including recommended time frames for evidence collection 16pursuant to evidence-based research. These materials shall be 17made available to all hospitals and approved pediatric health 18care facilities on the Office of the Attorney General's 19website.20    (d) This Section is effective on and after January 1, 212024. 22(Source: P.A. 101-634, eff. 6-5-20; 102-22, eff. 6-25-21; 23102-674, eff. 11-30-21.) 24    (410 ILCS 70/15 new)25    Sec. 15. Qualified medical provider list; Sexual Assault   SB1602 Enrolled- 72 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1Nurse Examiner and Sexual Assault Forensic Examiner 2qualifications.3    (a) The Office of the Attorney General shall maintain a 4list of qualified medical providers, which includes health 5care professionals who have been qualified by the Sexual 6Assault Nurse Examiner Program Coordinator at the Office of 7the Attorney General to practice as an Adult/Adolescent or 8Pediatric/Adolescent Sexual Assault Nurse Examiner, or 9Adult/Adolescent or Pediatric/Adolescent Sexual Assault 10Forensic Examiner. The list may also include Board-certified 11and Board-eligible child abuse pediatricians.12    (b) The Sexual Assault Nurse Examiner Program Coordinator 13shall review documentation submitted by health care 14professionals in accordance with this Section and ascertain 15whether standards for qualification are met:16        (1) To be qualified as an Adult/Adolescent or 17    Pediatric/Adolescent Sexual Assault Forensic Examiner, a 18    physician or physician assistant shall submit 19    documentation of didactic and clinical training, and 20    clinical experience, that meets or is substantially 21    similar to the Sexual Assault Nurse Examiner Education 22    Guidelines, established by the International Association 23    of Forensic Nurses. Didactic and clinical training shall 24    be documented in the form and manner prescribed by the 25    Office of the Attorney General.26        (2) To be qualified as an Adult/Adolescent or   SB1602 Enrolled- 73 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1    Pediatric/Adolescent Sexual Assault Nurse Examiner, an 2    advanced practice registered nurse or registered 3    professional nurse shall complete didactic and clinical 4    training that is consistent with the Sexual Assault Nurse 5    Examiner Education Guidelines established by the 6    International Association of Forensic Nurses and approved 7    by the Sexual Assault Nurse Examiner Program Coordinator. 8    Didactic and clinical training shall be documented in the 9    form and manner prescribed by the Office of the Attorney 10    General.11        A valid Sexual Assault Nurse Examiner certification by 12    the International Association of Forensic Nurses is 13    sufficient documentation for the Sexual Assault Nurse 14    Examiner Program Coordinator to qualify an advanced 15    practice registered nurse or registered professional nurse 16    as a qualified medical provider.17        (3) If a board-certified or board-eligible child abuse 18    pediatrician is included in the current Directory of 19    Healthcare Providers for Child Abuse and Neglect 20    Investigations, published by the Pediatric Resource 21    Center, or the successor report of a different name, then 22    the Sexual Assault Nurse Examiner Program Coordinator may 23    add that person to the list of qualified medical 24    providers.25    The Office of the Attorney General may require health care 26professionals to meet additional standards to be on the list,   SB1602 Enrolled- 74 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1if it is determined necessary at the time to ensure 2qualification is attained in accordance with applicable laws, 3rules, regulations, protocols, standards of care, and Sexual 4Assault Nurse Examiner Program goals. 5    (c) To remain on the Qualified Medical Provider List, 6Sexual Assault Nurse Examiners and Sexual Assault Forensic 7Examiners must verify their continuing education and 8competency as a qualified medical provider every 3 years. 9Sexual Assault Nurse Examiners and Sexual Assault Forensic 10Examiners shall submit the following documentation to the 11Sexual Assault Nurse Examiner Program Coordinator by April 1230th of the verification year so the Sexual Assault Nurse 13Examiner Program Coordinator can ascertain whether standards 14to remain on the Qualified Medical Provider List have been 15met.16    A valid Sexual Assault Nurse Examiner certification by the 17International Association of Forensic Nurses is sufficient 18documentation to verify a sexual assault nurse examiner's 19continued education and competency as a qualified medical 20provider.21    In lieu of an updated, valid International Association of 22Forensic Nurses certification, the Sexual Assault Nurse 23Examiner Coordinator, Emergency Department Director, or the 24Director of the facility where the health care professional is 25employed shall attest to the health care professional's 26continuing education and competency as a qualified medical   SB1602 Enrolled- 75 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1provider. If the health care professional is contracted to 2work as a Sexual Assault nurse examiner or sexual assault 3forensic examiner, then the Sexual assault nurse examiner 4Coordinator or Director of the staffing company shall attest 5to the health care professional's continuing education and 6competency as a qualified medical provider. The attestation 7shall be in the form and manner prescribed by the Office of the 8Illinois Attorney General.9    If the health care professional has had more than a 10one-year lapse in providing medical forensic examinations to 11patients, then a mock medical forensic examination must be 12completed for skill verification with a sexual assault nurse 13examiner certified by the International Association of 14Forensic Nursing.15    If documentation is submitted by April 30, then the Sexual 16Assault Nurse Examiner Program Coordinator shall provide 17notice of whether standards to remain on the Qualified Medical 18Provider list have been met by June 30th of the same year. If 19the submission is insufficient, then the notice shall include 20a statement of deficiencies and the standards for 21qualification to be met. The health care professional shall 22have 30 days after the notice is sent to cure a deficient 23submission. If a health care professional does not meet the 24standards to be on the Qualified Medical Provider List after a 25period to cure an insufficient submission, then the health 26care professional shall be notified and removed from the   SB1602 Enrolled- 76 -LRB104 10007 BDA 20077 b1Qualified Medical Provider List. If a sexual assault nurse 2examiner or sexual assault forensic examiner on the Qualified 3Medical Provider list does not verify continued education and 4competency as a qualified medical provider after 3 years and 5does not submit documentation to the Sexual Assault Nurse 6Examiner Program Coordinator by April 30 of the verification 7year, then the health care professional shall be notified that 8they will be removed from the Qualified Medical Provider List 9in 60 days. The health care professional shall submit 10sufficient documentation to remain on the Qualified Medical 11Provider list within the 60-day period or be removed from the 12Qualified Medical Provider List.13    (d) This Section is effective on and after January 1, 142026. 15    (410 ILCS 70/2.1 rep.)16    (410 ILCS 70/8.5 rep.)17    Section 10. The Sexual Assault Survivors Emergency 18Treatment Act is amended by repealing Sections 2.1 and 8.5.